Tennessee, session 114, HB2633.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 158 of the Private Acts of 1927, as amended and rewritten by
Chapter 1 of the Private Acts of 1989, Chapter 122 of the Private Acts of 1991, Chapter 147 of
the Private Acts of 1996; and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended in Article VIII by
deleting Section 4 and substituting:
Section 4. Nepotism prohibited. No relative of an elected city official shall be
hired by the city. No relative of the city manager shall be hired or employed by the city.
No person who is a relative of an employee shall be employed by the city to work in the
same department. "Relative" is defined as a parent; foster parent; parent-in-law; child;
spouse; brother; foster brother; sister; foster sister; grandparent; grandchild; son-in-law;
brother-in-law; daughter-in-law; sister-in-law; or any other family member who resides in
the same household.
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of the City of Springfield. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed
by the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
HB2633
010419
- 1 -